Utah statutes.
53C-4-201.   Surface leases and user permits -- Procedures for issuing leases and user permits.

(1)  The director may issue surface leases and user permits of trust lands for any term consistent with sound and prudent real estate practices.

(2)  This section does not apply to leases for grazing, oil, gas, and hydrocarbons, or other minerals.

(3) (a) (i)  Surface leases or user permits may be entered into by negotiation, public auction, or other public competitive bidding process as determined by rules of the director.

(ii)  Any lease or permit which includes an option to purchase at a future date must be entered into through a public competitive process.

(b)  Requests for proposals (RFP) on trust lands may be offered by the director after public notice.

